Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB629.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 216 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
A health facility as defined in KRS 216B.015 or a health care provider as defined in
KRS 304.17A.005 shall not refuse to provide a health service to a person solely because
that person has not received a particular vaccine.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/17/2025 11:39 AM Jacketed